New Jersey, session 222, A4012.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Energy Cost Fairness Act. 2.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electricity to end users within the State. Gas public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users within the State. Inclining block rate means a rate structure that imposes higher rates once usage exceeds certain thresholds, regardless of when the electricity or gas is consumed. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the board shall not authorize any rate increase by an electric public utility or a gas public utility where the utility assesses a charge that includes an inclining block rate for residential customers. c.     The board shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.